Tennessee, session 114, HB1482.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 1, Part 4, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "staging area" means an area that is used to
assemble, mobilize, and deploy vehicles, equipment, or materials, and related
personnel.
(b) Notwithstanding a law to the contrary, the following real property must not be
used as a staging area, processing location, or operations base for civil immigration
enforcement activities:
(1) A public parking lot, vacant lot, or garage that is owned and operated
by this state or a political subdivision of this state;
(2) The campus grounds of a public school; public charter school; or
private school, as defined in § 49-6-804; and
(3) Property owned by a religious institution that is exempt from property
taxes under § 67-5-212.
(c) For purposes of complying with subdivision (b)(1), state and local
government entities shall collaborate to identify publicly owned and controlled parking
lots, vacant lots, and garages that either have been used, or are likely to be used in the
future, as a staging area, processing location, or operations base for civil immigration
enforcement.
(d) A person who is responsible for the operation of real property described in
subdivision (b)(1) or (b)(2) shall, and a person who is responsible for the operation of
real property described in subdivision (b)(3) may:
- 2 - 010597

(1) Use, wherever appropriate, physical barriers such as locked gates to
limit access to the property; and
(2) Develop and implement procedures and policies necessary to
implement this section. Any such procedures and policies developed and
implemented for real property described in subdivision (b)(2) or (b)(3) must
provide that:
(A) A school or church employee, as applicable, who becomes
aware of the attempted or actual use the property as a staging area,
processing location, or operations base for civil immigration enforcement
shall immediately report such attempted or actual use to their supervisor;
and
(B) A supervisor who becomes aware of the attempted or actual
use of the property as a staging area, processing location, or operations
base for civil immigration enforcement, either through the supervisor's
own observation or a report made pursuant to subdivision (d)(2)(A), shall
report such attempted or actual use to the city mayor's office, if the
property is located within the jurisdiction of a municipality, or the county
mayor's office, if the property is located outside the jurisdiction of a
municipality, and local law enforcement.
(e) The department of safety, in consultation with the attorney general and
reporter, shall produce materials that provide general information concerning the rights
of employees, students, security staff, and partitioners regarding entry to real property by
federal agents. State government departments and agencies shall make the materials
available to the public.
- 3 - 010597

(f) This section does not restrict or interfere with the execution of lawful judicial
warrants or the enforcement of criminal law, nor does it limit the rights of any person
under state or federal law.
(g) This section does not prohibit the use of state-owned and -controlled
property for purposes other than a staging area, processing location, or operations base
for civil immigration enforcement, nor does it restrict any person from carrying out
functions unrelated to those purposes on such property.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 4 - 010597